Arkansas, session 2025, HB1926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-13-702(a)(5)(A), concerning the
immediate payment of a court imposed fine by a defendant, is amended to read
as follows:
(5)(A)(i) If the defendant claims an inability to pay the fine,
the court shall inquire into the defendant's ability to pay and shall make a
determination of the defendant's financial ability to pay the fine.
(ii) To assist the court in making a determination
of the defendant's financial ability to pay a fine under subdivision
(a)(5)(A)(i) of this section, the defendant shall provide to the court
information regarding the defendant's:
*ZRC100*
03/31/2025 1:39:22 PM ZRC100

HB1926
(a) Monthly income;
(b) Monthly housing costs;
(c) Monthly utility costs;
(d) Monthly childcare costs;
(e) Monthly transportation costs;
(f) Monthly healthcare costs;
(g) Monthly tax liability; and
(h) Other necessary monthly costs.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-13-708(a), concerning the revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of a driver's license requested by a court from the
Department of Finance and Administration, is amended to add an additional
subdivision read as follows:
(4) When making a determination to request a revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of a person's driver's license under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section, the court shall consider the information provided
under § 16-13-702(a)(5)(A)(ii).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 16-13-708(b), concerning the revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of a driver's license requested by a court from the
Department of Finance and Administration, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) For a driver's license revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal,
the court must provide the department with the reason for the revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal, the amount the person owes the court, and the
person's full name, date of birth, and last known address.
(2) If a person fails to provide the court with the information
required under § 16-13-702(a)(5)(A)(ii), the court shall include a
notification to the department of the person's failure to provide the
required information with the court's request for a driver's license
revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal.






03/31/2025 1:39:22 PM ZRC100